Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-185
Voluntary liquidation; procedure.

Any bank may voluntarily liquidate by paying off all its depositors in full. The bank so liquidating shall file a certified statement with the department, setting forth the fact that all its liabilities have been paid and naming its stockholders with the amount of stock held by each, and surrender its charter. The department shall cause an examination to be made of any such bank for the purpose of determining that all of its liabilities, except liabilities to stockholders, have been paid. Upon such examination, if it appears that all liabilities other than liabilities to stockholders have been paid, the bank shall cease to be subject to the Nebraska Banking Act.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 42, p. 86;

R.S.1913, § 321;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 42, p. 702;

Laws 1921, c. 299, § 1, p. 954;

C.S.1922, § 8022;

C.S.1929, § 8-169;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 39, p. 155;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-169;

R.S.1943, § 8-159;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 85, p. 167;

Laws 1987, LB 2, § 10;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 82.